Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5985.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 2701. As used in this part:
(a) "Board certified" means certified to practice in a
particular medical specialty by a national board recognized by the
American Board of Medical Specialties or the American Osteopathic
Association.
(b) "Certified nurse midwife" means an individual who is
licensed as a registered professional nurse under part 172 who has
EMR H06950'26 (H-1) rfvu0p


been granted a specialty certification in the practice of nurse
midwifery by the Michigan board of nursing under section 17210.
(c) "Certified nurse practitioner" means an individual who is
licensed as a registered professional nurse under part 172 who has
been granted a specialty certification as a nurse practitioner by
the Michigan board of nursing under section 17210.
(d) "Clinical nurse specialist-certified" means an individual
who is licensed as a registered professional nurse under part 172
who has been granted a specialty certification as a clinical nurse
specialist by the Michigan board of nursing under section 17210.
(e) "Dental school" means an accredited program for the
training of individuals to become dentists.
(f) "Dentist" means an individual who is licensed to engage in
the practice of dentistry under part 166.
(g) "Designated advanced practice registered nurse" means a
certified nurse midwife, certified nurse practitioner, or clinical
nurse specialist-certified.
(h) "Designated mental health professional" means an
individual who is qualified in the area of mental illness or
developmental disabilities and who is 1 of the following:
(i) A nurse.
(ii) A psychologist.
(iii) A licensed master's social worker.
(iv) A licensed professional counselor.
(v) A marriage and family therapist.
(i) "Designated physician" means a physician qualified in 1 of
the physician specialty areas identified in section 2711.
(j) "Designated professional" means a designated physician,
designated advanced practice registered nurse, dentist, physician's
EMR H06950'26 (H-1) rfvu0p


assistant, pharmacist, or designated mental health professional.
(k) "Health resource shortage area" means a geographic area,
population group, or health facility designated by the department
under section 2717.
(l) "Licensed master's social worker" means an individual who
is licensed under part 185 to engage in the practice of social work
at the master's level.
(m) "Licensed professional counselor" means an individual who
is licensed under part 181 to engage in the practice of counseling
without supervision.
(n) "Marriage and family therapist" means an individual who is
licensed under part 169 to engage in the practice of marriage and
family therapy.
(o) "Medicaid" means benefits under the program of medical
assistance established under title XIX of the social security act,
42 USC 1396 to 1396w-6, 1396w-9, and administered by the department
under the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b.
(p) "Medical school" means an accredited program for the
training of individuals to become physicians.
(q) "Medicare" means benefits under the federal Medicare
program established under title XVIII of the social security act,
42 USC 1395 to 1395lll.1395mmm.
(r) "Mental health professional program" means an accredited
program for the training of individuals to become a designated
mental health professional.
(s) "National Health Service Corps" means the agency
established under 42 USC 254d.
(t) "Nurse" means an individual who is licensed to engage in
the practice of nursing under part 172.
EMR H06950'26 (H-1) rfvu0p


(u) "Nursing program" means an accredited program for the
training of individuals to become nurses.
(v) "Pharmacist" means an individual who is licensed to engage
in the practice of pharmacy under part 177.
(w) "Pharmacy school" means an accredited program for the
training of individuals to become pharmacists.
(x) (v) "Physician" means an individual who is licensed as a
physician under part 170 or part 175.
(y) (w) "Physician's assistant" means an individual who is
licensed as a physician's assistant under part 170 or part 175.
(z) (x) "Physician's assistant program" means an accredited
program for the training of individuals to become physician's
assistants.
(aa) (y) "Psychologist" means an individual licensed to engage
in the practice of psychology under part 182.
(bb) (z) "Service obligation" means the contractual obligation
undertaken by an individual under section 2705 or section 2707 to
provide health care services for a determinable time period at a
site designated by the department.
Sec. 2705. (1) The department shall administer an essential
health provider repayment program for designated professionals who
have incurred a debt or expenses as a result of a loan taken to
attend a medical school, a dental school, a mental health
professional program, a nursing program for the training of
certified nurse midwives, certified nurse practitioners, or
clinical nurse specialists-certified, a pharmacy school, or a
physician's assistant program or as a result of providing services
in a health resource shortage area. The department may each year
repay all or part of a designated professional's debt or expenses,
EMR H06950'26 (H-1) rfvu0p


but the amount repaid in any 1 year shall must not exceed the
amount described in subsection (3). The department shall repay a
debt or expenses only for a designated professional who has entered
into a written contract with the department that requires the
designated professional to engage in the full-time practice of
health care services in a health resource shortage area to which he
or she the designated professional is assigned by the department
for a period equal in years to the number of years for which the
department has agreed in the contract to make a debt or expense
repayment, or for a period of 2 years, whichever is greater.
(2) A debt or expense repayment on behalf of a designated
professional under subsection (1) for fulfilling a service
obligation for a particular year must be paid in a lump sum at the
completion of the service obligation for that year. A designated
professional who does not fulfill a service obligation for a
particular year forfeits his or her the designated professional's
right to the debt or expense repayment or any part of it for that
year and the department may treat an agreement for further debt or
expense repayment in a subsequent year as void. In its sole
discretion, the department may make a debt or expense repayment
before or during each year of service if there are extenuating
circumstances. In its sole discretion, the department may pay a pro
rata amount of an agreed debt or expense repayment to a designated
professional or his or her the designated professional's estate if
1 of the following occurs before the completion of the designated
professional's service obligation:
(a) The designated professional dies.
(b) The designated professional is unable, by reason of
permanent disability, to render the service.
EMR H06950'26 (H-1) rfvu0p


(c) Other circumstances prevail that are considered by the
department to constitute a compelling reason to consider the
service obligation fulfilled.
(3) In any year of a debt or expense repayment program, the
maximum amount of a debt or expense repayment is $40,000.00 per
year. The maximum amount of debt or expense repayment the
department may pay on behalf of a designated professional is
$300,000.00, paid over a period of 10 years or more. The written
contract described in subsection (1) must include the amount the
department shall pay on behalf of a designated professional and the
amount payable for each year of service.
(4) The department may accept funds from any source for the
operation of the essential health provider repayment program, and
the department shall distribute those funds in a manner consistent
with this section.
(5) The department shall give the essential health provider
repayment program created by this section priority over the other
programs created under this part.
Final Page
EMR H06950'26 (H-1) rfvu0p